Hawaii statutes.
§449-11 Fidelity bonds; insurance or other security
devices. [See Note below.] A licensed escrow depository shall at
all times either:

(1) Maintain a fidelity bond executed by a surety
insurer authorized to do business in the State in an amount not less than $100,000;
provided that any bond which is subject to a deductible thereunder in excess of
$10,000 per occurrence shall require the prior approval of the commissioner,
who may take into consideration, among other factors, the amount of the
proposed bond; or

(2) Deposit an equivalent amount of cash or other
security device under such terms and conditions as are acceptable to the
commissioner,

upon all of its directors, officers, and employees
who have access to money or negotiable securities or instruments in its
possession or under its control. Notwithstanding the above provision, the
escrow depository may carry bonds or deposit cash or securities above the
amounts required by the commissioner. [L 1967, c 144, pt of §1; HRS §449-11; am
L 1970, c 72, §2; am L 1985, c 269, §50; am L 1996, c 41, §1; am L 2001, c 184,
§3; am L 2013, c 166, §7]

Note

The 2013 amendment, with respect to licensees in operation on
June 21, 2013, shall take effect on the date of the renewal of the security
device, but not later than July 1, 2014. L 2013, c 166, §11.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next